District of Columbia statutes.
2-1574

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted by the Mayor to the Council for review and approval.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-32, § 5, 52 DCR 7475

History